Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-511
Sale, lease, or transfer; excessive promotion expenditures; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation, violating any provision of section 70-510 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Initiative Law 1930, No. 324, § 7;

Laws 1931, c. 116, § 7, p. 340;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-607;

R.S.1943, § 70-511;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 138.